packages/hunspell-reader/dictionaries/eu/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 70 Y 77
SFX 70 0 0 .
SFX 70 0 a .
SFX 70 0 ago .
SFX 70 0 ago/1,362 .
SFX 70 0 ak .
SFX 70 0 an .
SFX 70 0 arekin .
SFX 70 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 aren .
SFX 70 0 arendako .
SFX 70 0 arentzat .
SFX 70 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 70 0 ari .
SFX 70 0 az .
SFX 70 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 70 0 dun .
SFX 70 0 dun/1,373 .
SFX 70 0 ei .
SFX 70 0 ek .
SFX 70 0 ekin .
SFX 70 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 en .
SFX 70 0 endako .
SFX 70 0 entzat .
SFX 70 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 70 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 70 0 ez .
SFX 70 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 70 0 gatik .
SFX 70 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 gile .
SFX 70 0 gile/1,362 .
SFX 70 0 go .
SFX 70 0 go/1,388 .
SFX 70 0 i .
SFX 70 0 ik .
SFX 70 0 k .
SFX 70 0 ka .
SFX 70 0 ka/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 oi .
SFX 70 0 ok .
SFX 70 0 okin .
SFX 70 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 on .
SFX 70 0 ontzat .
SFX 70 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 70 0 otaz .
SFX 70 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 70 0 oz .
SFX 70 0 pe .
SFX 70 0 pe/1,379 .
SFX 70 0 ra .
SFX 70 0 raino .
SFX 70 0 raino/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 rantz .
SFX 70 0 rantz/1,380 .
SFX 70 0 ranz/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 rat .
SFX 70 0 ra/1,381 .
SFX 70 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 70 0 ta/1,375 .
SFX 70 0 tik .
SFX 70 0 ti/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 tsu .
SFX 70 0 tsu/1,361 .
SFX 70 0 txo .
SFX 70 0 txo/1,387 .
SFX 70 0 tzar .
SFX 70 0 tzarr/1,389 .
SFX 70 0 tzar/1,385 .
SFX 70 0 tzat .
SFX 70 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 70 0 z .
SFX 70 0 z/1,370 .
SFX 79 Y 75
SFX 79 0 0 .
SFX 79 0 a .
SFX 79 0 ago .
SFX 79 0 ago/1,362 .
SFX 79 0 ak .
SFX 79 0 arekin .
SFX 79 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 aren .
SFX 79 0 arendako .
SFX 79 0 arentzat .
SFX 79 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 79 0 ari .
SFX 79 0 az .
SFX 79 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 79 0 dun .
SFX 79 0 dun/1,373 .
SFX 79 0 ean .
SFX 79 0 egi .
SFX 79 0 egi/1,362 .
SFX 79 0 ei .
SFX 79 0 ek .
SFX 79 0 ekin .
SFX 79 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 eko .
SFX 79 0 eko/1,378 .
SFX 79 0 en .
SFX 79 0 endako .
SFX 79 0 entzat .
SFX 79 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 en/1,374 .
SFX 79 0 era .
SFX 79 0 eraino .
SFX 79 0 eraino/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 erantz .
SFX 79 0 erantz/1,380 .
SFX 79 0 eranz/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 erat .
SFX 79 0 era/1,381 .
SFX 79 0 er/1,383 .
SFX 79 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 79 0 etik .
SFX 79 0 eti/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 ez .
SFX 79 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 79 0 gatik .
SFX 79 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 i .
SFX 79 0 ik .
SFX 79 0 ki .
SFX 79 0 ki/1,376 .
SFX 79 0 oi .
SFX 79 0 ok .
SFX 79 0 okin .
SFX 79 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 on .
SFX 79 0 ontzat .
SFX 79 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 79 0 otaz .
SFX 79 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 79 0 oz .
SFX 79 0 pe .
SFX 79 0 pe/1,379 .
SFX 79 0 tasun .
SFX 79 0 tasun/1,363 .
SFX 79 0 txo .
SFX 79 0 txo/1,369 .
SFX 79 0 tzar .
SFX 79 0 tzarr/1,384 .
SFX 79 0 tzar/1,385 .
SFX 79 0 tzat .
SFX 79 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 79 0 xe/1,386 .
SFX 78 Y 32
SFX 78 0 0 .
SFX 78 0 dako .
SFX 78 0 ekin .
SFX 78 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 78 0 en .
SFX 78 0 endako .
SFX 78 0 entzat .
SFX 78 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 78 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 78 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 78 0 gatik .
SFX 78 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 78 0 go .
SFX 78 0 go/1,378 .
SFX 78 0 i .
SFX 78 0 ik .
SFX 78 0 i/1,370 .
SFX 78 0 k .
SFX 78 0 n .
SFX 78 0 ra .
SFX 78 0 raino .
SFX 78 0 raino/1,370 .
SFX 78 0 rantz .
SFX 78 0 rantz/1,380 .
SFX 78 0 ranz/1,370 .
SFX 78 0 rat .
SFX 78 0 ra/1,381 .
SFX 78 0 r/1,383 .
SFX 78 0 tik .
SFX 78 0 ti/1,370 .
SFX 78 0 z .
SFX 78 0 z/1,370 .
SFX 2 Y 24
SFX 2 0 0 .
SFX 2 0 dura .
SFX 2 0 dura/1,359 .
SFX 2 0 dur/1,360 .
SFX 2 0 garri .
SFX 2 0 garri/1,361 .
SFX 2 0 men .
SFX 2 0 mendu .
SFX 2 0 mendu/1,362 .
SFX 2 0 men/1,363 .
SFX 2 0 pen .
SFX 2 0 pen/1,363 .
SFX 2 0 raz .
SFX 2 0 raz/1,364 .
SFX 2 0 tu .
SFX 2 0 tu/1,365 .
SFX 2 0 tzaile .
SFX 2 0 tzaile/1,366 .
SFX 2 0 tze .
SFX 2 0 tzear .
SFX 2 0 tzeke .
SFX 2 0 tzen .
SFX 2 0 tzen/1,367 .
SFX 2 0 tze/1,368 .
SFX 8 Y 1
SFX 8 0 0 .
SFX 68 Y 57
SFX 68 0 0 .
SFX 68 0 a .
SFX 68 0 ago .
SFX 68 0 ago/1,362 .
SFX 68 0 ak .
SFX 68 0 arekin .
SFX 68 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 68 0 aren .
SFX 68 0 arendako .
SFX 68 0 arentzat .
SFX 68 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 68 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 68 0 ari .
SFX 68 0 az .
SFX 68 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 68 0 ean .
SFX 68 0 ei .
SFX 68 0 ek .
SFX 68 0 ekin .
SFX 68 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 68 0 eko .
SFX 68 0 eko/1,388 .
SFX 68 0 en .
SFX 68 0 endako .
SFX 68 0 entzat .
SFX 68 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 68 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 68 0 era .
SFX 68 0 eraino .
SFX 68 0 eraino/1,370 .
SFX 68 0 erantz .
SFX 68 0 erantz/1,380 .
SFX 68 0 eranz/1,370 .
SFX 68 0 erat .
SFX 68 0 era/1,381 .
SFX 68 0 er/1,383 .
SFX 68 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 68 0 etik .
SFX 68 0 eti/1,370 .
SFX 68 0 ez .
SFX 68 0 ez/1,370 .
SFX 68 0 e/1,382 .
SFX 68 0 gatik .
SFX 68 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 68 0 i .
SFX 68 0 ik .
SFX 68 0 oi .
SFX 68 0 ok .
SFX 68 0 okin .
SFX 68 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 68 0 on .
SFX 68 0 ontzat .
SFX 68 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 68 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 68 0 otaz .
SFX 68 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 68 0 oz .
SFX 120 Y 19
SFX 120 0 0 .
SFX 120 0 garri .
SFX 120 0 garri/1,361 .
SFX 120 0 men .
SFX 120 0 mendu .
SFX 120 0 mendu/1,362 .
SFX 120 0 men/1,363 .
SFX 120 0 pen .
SFX 120 0 pen/1,363 .
SFX 120 0 taraz .
SFX 120 0 taraz/1,364 .
SFX 120 0 te .
SFX 120 0 tear .
SFX 120 0 teke .
SFX 120 0 ten .
SFX 120 0 ten/1,367 .
SFX 120 0 te/1,368 .
SFX 120 0 tu .
SFX 120 0 tu/1,365 .
SFX 121 Y 3
SFX 121 0 0 .
SFX 121 0 ago .
SFX 121 0 ago/1,390 .
SFX 122 Y 7
SFX 122 0 0 .
SFX 122 0 ago .
SFX 122 0 ago/1,390 .
SFX 122 0 egi .
SFX 122 0 egi/1,390 .
SFX 122 0 en .
SFX 122 0 en/1,391 .
SFX 123 Y 19
SFX 123 0 0 .
SFX 123 0 du .
SFX 123 0 du/1,365 .
SFX 123 0 garri .
SFX 123 0 garri/1,361 .
SFX 123 0 men .
SFX 123 0 mendu .
SFX 123 0 mendu/1,362 .
SFX 123 0 men/1,363 .
SFX 123 0 pen .
SFX 123 0 pen/1,363 .
SFX 123 0 taraz .
SFX 123 0 taraz/1,364 .
SFX 123 0 tze .
SFX 123 0 tzear .
SFX 123 0 tzeke .
SFX 123 0 tzen .
SFX 123 0 tzen/1,367 .
SFX 123 0 tze/1,368 .
SFX 124 Y 59
SFX 124 0 0 .
SFX 124 0 ño .
SFX 124 0 ño/1,387 .
SFX 124 0 a .
SFX 124 0 ago .
SFX 124 0 ago/1,362 .
SFX 124 0 ak .
SFX 124 0 an .
SFX 124 0 arekin .
SFX 124 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 124 0 aren .
SFX 124 0 arendako .
SFX 124 0 arentzat .
SFX 124 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 124 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 124 0 ari .
SFX 124 0 az .
SFX 124 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 124 0 dun .
SFX 124 0 dun/1,373 .
SFX 124 0 ei .
SFX 124 0 ek .
SFX 124 0 ekin .
SFX 124 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 124 0 en .
SFX 124 0 endako .
SFX 124 0 entzat .
SFX 124 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 124 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 124 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 124 0 ez .
SFX 124 0 gatik .
SFX 124 0 gati/1,370 .
SFX 124 0 gile .
SFX 124 0 gile/1,362 .
SFX 124 0 ka .
SFX 124 0 ka/1,370 .
SFX 124 0 oi .
SFX 124 0 ok .
SFX 124 0 okin .
SFX 124 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 124 0 on .
SFX 124 0 ontzat .
SFX 124 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 124 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 124 0 otaz .
SFX 124 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 124 0 oz .
SFX 124 0 pe .
SFX 124 0 pe/1,379 .
SFX 124 0 tsu .
SFX 124 0 tsu/1,361 .
SFX 124 0 txo .
SFX 124 0 txo/1,387 .
SFX 124 0 tzar .
SFX 124 0 tzarr/1,389 .
SFX 124 0 tzar/1,385 .
SFX 124 0 tzat .
SFX 124 0 tza/1,370 .
SFX 125 Y 56
SFX 125 0 ño .
SFX 125 0 ño/1,387 .
SFX 125 0 a .
SFX 125 0 ago .
SFX 125 0 ago/1,362 .
SFX 125 0 ak .
SFX 125 0 an .
SFX 125 0 arekin .
SFX 125 0 areki/1,370 .
SFX 125 0 aren .
SFX 125 0 arendako .
SFX 125 0 arentzat .
SFX 125 0 arentza/1,370 .
SFX 125 0 aren/1,371 .
SFX 125 0 ari .
SFX 125 0 az .
SFX 125 0 a/1,372 .
SFX 125 0 dun .
SFX 125 0 dun/1,373 .
SFX 125 0 ei .
SFX 125 0 ek .
SFX 125 0 ekin .
SFX 125 0 eki/1,370 .
SFX 125 0 en .
SFX 125 0 endako .
SFX 125 0 entzat .
SFX 125 0 entza/1,370 .
SFX 125 0 en/1,371 .
SFX 125 0 eta/1,375 .
SFX 125 0 ez .
SFX 125 0 gile .
SFX 125 0 gile/1,362 .
SFX 125 0 ka .
SFX 125 0 ka/1,370 .
SFX 125 0 oi .
SFX 125 0 ok .
SFX 125 0 okin .
SFX 125 0 oki/1,370 .
SFX 125 0 on .
SFX 125 0 ontzat .
SFX 125 0 ontza/1,370 .
SFX 125 0 on/1,371 .
SFX 125 0 otaz .
SFX 125 0 ota/1,375 .
SFX 125 0 oz .
SFX 125 0 pe .
SFX 125 0 pe/1,379 .
SFX 125 0 tsu .
SFX 125 0 tsu/1,361 .
SFX 125 0 txo .
SFX 125 0 txo/1,387 .
SFX 125 0 tzar .
SFX 125 0 tzarr/1,389 .
SFX 125 0 tzar/1,385 .
SFX 125 0 tzat .
SFX 125 0 tza/1,370 .
